Rhode Island, session 2025, SB292.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13-8-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 13-8 entitled "Parole" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
13-8-2. Qualifications of board members.
The seven (7) electors to be named by the governor shall have the following qualifications:
(1)(i) One of the qualified electors shall be a psychologist or a physician who is
professionally qualified in the field of psychiatry or neurology;
(ii) One shall be a member in good standing of the Rhode Island bar;
(iii) One shall be a person who is professionally trained in correctional work or in some
closely related general field as a social work; and
(iv) One shall be a law enforcement officer; and
(v) One shall be a person formerly incarcerated or directly impacted by the criminal legal
system who has completed the probation and parole process three (3) or more years prior with a
background in one of the following areas: psychology, mental health and/or substance use,
transitional housing, re-entry after incarceration, education or law.
(2) All of the qualified electors shall be individuals who shall also have shown an interest
in social welfare problems.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000669
========
LC000669 - Page 2 of 3